Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2507
Allocation of funds for road purposes; factors used.

The following factors and weights shall be used in determining the amount to be allocated to each of the counties or municipal counties for road purposes each year:

(1) Rural population of each county or municipal county, as determined by the most recent federal census, twenty percent;

(2) Total population of each county or municipal county, as determined by the most recent federal census, ten percent;

(3) Lineal feet of bridges twenty feet or more in length and all overpasses in each county or municipal county, as determined by the most recent inventory available within the Department of Transportation, ten percent, and for purposes of this subdivision a bridge or overpass located partly in one county or municipal county and partly in another shall be considered as being located one-half in each county or municipal county;

(4) Total motor vehicle registrations, other than prorated commercial vehicles, in the rural areas of each county or municipal county, as determined from the most recent information available from the Department of Motor Vehicles, twenty percent;

(5) Total motor vehicle registrations, other than prorated commercial vehicles, in each county or municipal county as determined from the most recent information available from the Department of Motor Vehicles, ten percent;

(6) Total miles of county or municipal county and township roads within each county or municipal county, as determined by the most recent inventory available within the Department of Transportation, twenty percent; and

(7) Value of farm products sold from each county or municipal county, as determined from the most recent federal Census of Agriculture, ten percent.

Laws 1969, c. 315, § 7, p. 1135;

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 42;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 165.